Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.90.090

Electronic data tampering in the second degree.

(1) A person is guilty of electronic data tampering in the second degree if he or she maliciously and without authorization:

(a) Alters data as it transmits between two data systems over an open or unsecure network under circumstances not constituting the offense in the first degree; or

(b) Introduces any malware into any electronic data, data system, or data network under circumstances not constituting the offense in the first degree.

(2) Electronic data tampering in the second degree is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2016 c 164 s 9.]